Massachusetts, session 194th, H4857.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 57 of chapter 276 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 12, the words “and may”. 
SECTION 2. Said section 57 of said chapter 276 of the General Laws is hereby further 
amended by inserting, in line 14, after the word “him” the following words:- 
; and may, if determined to be necessary, order the defendant to abide by specified 
restrictions on personal associations or conduct including, but not limited to, avoiding all contact 
with an alleged victim of the crime and any potential witness or witnesses who may testify 
concerning the offense, as a condition of release. 
SECTION 3. Section 58B of said chapter 276 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by inserting, in line 2, after the number “42A,” the following number: - 57